Utah statutes.
70A-2-321.   C.I.F. or C.&F. -- "Net landed weights" -- "Payment on arrival"
-- Warranty of condition on arrival.
Under a contract containing a term C.I.F. or C.&F.
(1)  Where the price is based on or is to be adjusted according to "net landed
weights," "delivered weights," "out turn" quantity or quality or the like,
unless otherwise agreed the seller must reasonably estimate the price. The
payment due on tender of the documents called for by the contract is the
amount so estimated, but after final adjustment of the price a settlement must
be made with commercial promptness.
(2)  An agreement described in Subsection (1) or any warranty of quality or
condition of the goods on arrival places upon the seller the risk of ordinary
deterioration, shrinkage and the like in transportation but has no effect on
the place or time of identification to the contract for sale or delivery or on
the passing of the risk of loss.
(3)  Unless otherwise agreed where the contract provides for payment on or
after arrival of the goods the seller must before payment allow such
preliminary inspection as is feasible; but if the goods are lost delivery of
the documents and payment are due when the goods should have arrived.
